zh-TW: 汽機車排氣管類型: 軸背; 貓背; 柴油顆粒過濾器 (DPF); 雙後出口; 雙側出口; 頁頭後退; 高效能; 對置雙排氣; 四出口; 單出口; 三重出口; 渦輪回程; 其他
da: Type af udstødningsrør til køretøjer: Aksel-tilbage; Catback; Dieselpartikelfilter (DPF); Dobelt bagsideudløb; Dobbelt sideudløb; Header-back; Høj ydeevne; Modsat dobbelt udstødning; Quad-udgang; Enkelt udgang; Tredobbelt udgang; Turbo-back; Andet
bg-BG: Тип изпускателна система на превозно средство: Задна ос; Cat-back; Филтър за твърди частици (DPF); Двоен заден изход; Двоен страничен изход; Header-back; Висока производителност; Противоположен двоен ауспух; Четворен изход; Единичен изход; Троен изход; Turbo-back; Други
pl: Rodzaj układu wydechowego pojazdu: Tylna oś; Za katalizatorem; Filtr cząstek stałych; Z dwoma końcówkami wydechowymi z tyłu; Z dwoma końcówkami wydechowymi po bokach; Od kolektorów wydechowych; Wysoka efektywność; Z dwoma rurami wydechowymi z przeciwnych stron silnika; Z czterema końcówkami; Z jedną końcówką; Z trzema końcówkami; Od turboskrężarki; Inne
de: Auspufftyp des Fahrzeugs: Hinterachse; Cat-Back; Dieselpartikelfilter (DPF); Doppelter Heckauspuff; Doppelter Seitenauspuff; Header-Back; Hochleistung; Gegenüberliegender Doppelauspuff; Quad-Auspuff; Einzelausgang; Dreifach-Auspuff; Turbo-Back; Sonstiges
ko: 차량 배기 타입: 액슬백; 캣백; 디젤 미립자 필터(DPF); 이중 후면 출구; 이중 측면 출구; 헤더백; 고성능; 듀얼 머플러; 쿼드 출구; 단일 출구; 트리플 출구; 터보백; 기타
sv: Typ av avgassystem: Bakaxel; Cat-back; Dieselpartikelfilter (DPF); Dubbel utgång bak; Dubbel sidoutgång; Header-back; Hög prestanda; Motsatt dubbla avgasrör; Quadutgång; Enkel utgång; Trippel utgång; Turbo-back; Övrigt
tr: Araç egzoz tipi: Aks arkası; katalizatör arkası; Dizel partikül filtresi (DPF); Çift arka çıkış; Çift yan çıkış; Başlık arkası; Yüksek performans; Karşılıklı çift egzoz; Dörtlü çıkış; Tek çıkış; Üçlü çıkış; Turbo-arkası; Diğer
zh-CN: 车辆尾气类型: 轴背排气; 中尾段排气; 柴油颗粒过滤器; 双后出; 双侧出; 头段至尾段; 高性能; 对置双排气; 四出; 单出; 三出; 涡轮至尾段; 其他
ja: 車両排気タイプ: アクスルバック; キャットバック; ディーゼル微粒子フィルター (DPF); 両側後方出口; 両側出口; ヘッダーバック; 高パフォーマンス; 反対側のデュアル出口; クワッド出口; シングル出口; トリプル出口; ターボバック; その他
pt-PT: Tipo de escape para veículos: Eixo traseiro; Cat-back; Filtro de partículas diesel (DPF); Saída traseira dupla; Saída lateral dupla; Cabeçalho; Alto desempenho; Escape duplo oposto; Saída quádrupla; Saída única; Saída tripla; Turbo para trás; Outro
sk-SK: Typ výfuku vozidla: Zadná náprava; Cat-back; Filter pevných častíc (DPF); Dvojitý zadný výstup; Dvojstranný výstup; Header-back (Hlavička-zadná časť); Vysoký výkon; Opačný dvojitý výfuk; Štvoritý výstup; Jediný výstup; Trojitý výstup; Turbo-back; Iné
ro-RO: Tipul de evacuare al vehiculului: Axle-back; Cat-back; Filtru de particule diesel (DPF); Ieșire dublă spate; Ieșire laterală dublă; Header-back; Performanță ridicată; Sistem dublu de evacuare în direcții opuse; Evacuare quad; Evacuare single; Evacuare triple; Turbo-back; Altele
it: Tipo di scarico del veicolo: Asse posteriore; Cat-back; Filtro antiparticolato diesel (DPF); Doppia uscita posteriore; Uscita su due lati; Colpo di testa indietro; Ad alte prestazioni; Doppio scarico opposto; Uscita quadrupla; Uscita singola; Tripla uscita; Turbo indietro; Altro
nl: Type uitlaat van voertuigen: As-achter; Cat-back; Dieselpartikelfilter (DPF); Dubbele achteruitgang; Dubbele zijuitgang; Header-back; Prestatie; Tegenover dubbele uitlaat; Viervoudige uitgang; Enkele uitgang; Drievoudige uitgang; Turbo-back; Andere
nb: Kjøretøyeksostype: Axel-back; Cat-back; Dieselpartikkelfilter (DPF); Dobbel utgang bak; Dobbel utgang på siden; Header-back; Høy ytelse; Motsatt dobbel eksos; Quad-utgang; Enkelutgang; Trippel utgang; Turbo-back; Annet
el: Τύπος εξάτμισης οχήματος: Πίσω άξονας; Γάτα-πίσω; Φίλτρο σωματιδίων ντίζελ (DPF); Διπλή πίσω έξοδος; Διπλή πλευρική έξοδος; Κεφαλιά πίσω; Υψηλή απόδοση; Απέναντι διπλή εξάτμιση; Τετραγωνική έξοδος; Μονή έξοδος; Τριπλή έξοδος; Turbo-back; Άλλο
th: ประเภทท่อไอเสียรถยนต์: ระบบ Axle-back; ระบบ Cat-back; ตัวกรองอนุภาคไอเสียดีเซล (DPF); ทางออกด้านหลังแบบคู่; ทางออกด้านข้างแบบคู่; ระบบ Header-back; ประสิทธิภาพสูง; ท่อไอเสียคู่แบบตรงข้าม; ทางออกสี่ทาง; ทางออกเดียว; ทางออกสามทาง; ระบบ Turbo-back; อื่นๆ
cs: Vlastnosti výfuku vozidla: Zadní náprava; Naklonění dozadu; Filtr pevných částic (DPF); Dvojitý zadní výstup; Dvojitý boční výstup; Hlavička-zadní; Vysoká výkonnost; Protější duální výfuk; Čtyřnásobný výstup; Jeden výstup; Trojitý výstup; Turbo-zadní; Jiné
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės išmetimo sistemos tipas: „Axle-back“; „Cat-back“; Dyzelino kietųjų dalelių filtras (DPF); Dvigubas galinis išmetimas; Dvigubas šoninis išmetimas; „Header-back“; Itin našus; Priešingas dviejų vamzdžių išmetimas; Keturių vamzdžių išmetimas; Vieno vamzdžio išmetimas; Trijų vamzdžių išmetimas; „Turbo-back“; Kita
fi: Ajoneuvon pakoputkityyppi: Akselin takaosa; Kallista taaksepäin; Dieselin hiukkassuodatin (DPF); Kaksi takaulostuloa; Kaksi sivu-ulostuloa; Header-back; Korkea suorituskyky; Vastapäinen kaksoispoisto; Nelinkertainen ulostulo; Yksi ulostulo; Kolme ulostuloa; Turbo-back; Muu
hu: Járműkipufogó típusa: Axle-back; Cat-back; Dízel részecskeszűrő (DPF); Kettős hátsó kijárat; Kettős oldalsó kijárat; Header-back; Nagy teljesítmény; Ellenirányú kettős kipufogó; Négyes kijárat; Egyes kijárat; Hármas kijárat; Turbo-back; Egyéb
en: Vehicle exhaust type: Axle-back; Cat-back; Diesel particulate filter (DPF); Dual rear exit; Dual side exit; Header-back; High performance; Opposite dual exhaust; Quad exit; Single exit; Triple exit; Turbo-back; Other
es: Tipo de escape del vehículo: Después del eje; Después de catalizador; Filtro de partículas diésel (DPF); Salida trasera doble; Salida lateral doble; Desde el múltiple de escape; Alto rendimiento; Escape doble opuesto; Salida cuádruple; Salida única; Salida triple; Turbo-back; Otros
pt-BR: Tipo de escapamento do veículo: Eixo traseiro; Cat-back; Filtro de partículas diesel (DPF); Saída traseira dupla; Saída lateral dupla; Cabeçote; Alta performance; Escape duplo oposto; Saída quádrupla; Saída única; Saída tripla; Turbo; Outro
hr-HR: Tip ispušnog sustava vozila: Stražnja osovina; Cat-back; Filtar dizelskih čestica (DPF); Dvostruki stražnji izlaz; Dvostruki bočni izlaz; Header-back; Visoke performanse; Nasuprotni dvostruki ispuh; Četiri cijevi; Jedna cijev; Tri cijevi; Turbo-back; Ostalo
fr: Type d’échappement du véhicule: Essieu arrière; Catback; Filtre à particules diesel (DPF); Double sortie arrière; Double sortie latérale; Header-back; Haute performance; Échappement double opposé; Sortie quadruple; Sortie unique; Triple sortie; Turbo-back; Autre
ru: Тип автомобильной выхлопной системы: Задняя ось; Задняя катушка; Дизельный сажевый фильтр (DPF); Двойной задний выхлоп; Двусторонний выхлоп; Сзади и спереди; Высокая производительность; Противоположный двойной выхлоп; Четыре; Один; Три; Задние турбины; Другое
vi: Loại khí xả của xe: Trục sau; Xả cat-back; Bộ lọc hạt diesel (DPF); Xả kép phía sau; Xả kép hai bên; Xả header-back; Hiệu suất cao; Ống xả kép đối diện; Bốn ống xả; Một ống xả; Ba ống xả; Xả turbo-back; Khác
sl-SI: Vrsta izpuha vozila: Zadnja os; Cat-back; Filter trdih delcev (DPF); Dvojni zadnji izhod; Dvojni stranski izhod; Header-back; Visoka zmogljivost; Nasprotni dvojni izpuh; Quad izhod; Enojni izhod; Trojni izhod; Turbo zadnji; Drugo